Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.10.060

Articles of amendment.

A corporation amending its articles of incorporation must deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment stating:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The text of each amendment adopted;

(3) If an amendment provides for an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of issued shares, provisions for implementing the amendment if not contained in the amendment itself;

(4) The date of each amendment's adoption;

(5) If an amendment was adopted by the incorporators or board of directors without shareholder approval, a statement to that effect and that shareholder approval was not required;

(6) If shareholder approval was required, a statement that the amendment was duly approved by the shareholders in accordance with the provisions of RCW 23B.10.030 and 23B.10.040; and

(7) If an amendment is being filed pursuant to RCW 23B.01.200(3)(e), a statement to that effect.

[ 2020 c 194 s 10; 2009 c 189 s 32; 1989 c 165 s 125.]